Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0304

Voting by district, class, or voting group.

(1) This section applies if the organic rules provide for voting by district or class, or if there is one or more identifiable voting groups that a proposed amendment to the organic rules would affect differently from other members with respect to matters identified in RCW 23.100.0305(5) (a) through (e). Approval of the amendment requires the same percentage of votes of the members of that district, class, or voting group required in RCW 23.100.0305 and 23.100.0414.

(2) If a proposed amendment to the organic rules would affect members in two or more districts or classes entitled to vote separately under subsection (1) of this section in the same or a substantially similar way, the districts or classes affected must vote as a single voting group unless the organic rules otherwise provide for separate voting.

[ 2019 c 37 s 304.]